Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Part 2

State Librarian and Archivist

10-1-201. Appointment — Duties and powers.

A state librarian and archivist shall be appointed by the secretary of state. The person appointed as librarian and archivist shall be appointed without regard to political affiliation or place of previous residence. The state librarian and archivist shall serve as chief administrative officer of the state library system and shall be responsible to the secretary of state.

Acts 1951, ch. 197, § 2 (Williams, § 2278.6); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-108; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 11; 1983, ch. 37, § 8; 1984, ch. 728, § 5; 2008, ch. 631, § 14.

10-1-202. Authority to employ special consultants.

Upon recommendation of the state librarian and archivist, the secretary of state, within the limitation of funds available, may engage the services of special consultants who are qualified in particular fields of library or archival administration to make special investigations, studies and reports looking to the proper development of methods and procedures by means of which the state library service may be strengthened, extended or made more efficient.

Acts 1951, ch. 197, § 2 (Williams, § 2278.6); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-109; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 12; 1984, ch. 728, § 6; 2008, ch. 631, § 15.

10-1-203. Preservation of records of soldiers and sailors serving in World War I.

The compilation of the records of the soldiers and sailors who served in World War I by enlistment from the state of Tennessee, compiled by Mrs. Rutledge Smith of Nashville, and a committee working under Mrs. Smith's supervision, consisting of separate volumes for each county, are declared to be public records of the state, and shall be carefully preserved by the state librarian and archivist as a part of the official records of this state, and copies thereof, duly certified by the state librarian and archivist, shall be receivable in evidence in all courts of competent jurisdiction in this state as to the truth of the facts therein recited.

Acts 1937, ch. 301, §§ 1, 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 2287.1 (Williams, §§ 2287.1, 2287.3); impl. am. Acts 1951, ch. 197, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-112.

10-1-204. Federal funds for library programs.

The secretary of state is authorized and empowered to make agreements with the United States and its agencies in regard to the administration of library programs, and to accept federal funds upon such terms and conditions as may be required by act of congress or rules and regulations issued in accordance with such act; provided, that state funds shall not be obligated for participation in any federal program unless the same are paid from current appropriations or operating funds. If required, the state treasurer shall give receipt for such funds, make a special bond for the same, or keep special accounts of such funds. At the end of this or succeeding bienniums, such funds shall not become a part of the state's general fund but shall be expended only for such library purposes as may have been agreed upon.

Acts 1957, ch. 84, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 12; T.C.A., § 10-113; Acts 1982, ch. 689, § 13; 1984, ch. 728, § 7; 2008, ch. 631, § 16.